src/morphology/stems/adv.lexc
LEXICON adv

+Adv: # ;

LEXICON advcomp
+Adv+Cmp: # ;

LEXICON advsuperl
+Adv+Superl: # ;

LEXICON Adverb 
harav adv ;
íalt adv ;
áhugavert adv ;
tíverri adv ;
stórvegis adv ;
burturav adv ;
so adv ;
ov adv ;
einans adv ;
nærum adv ;
nærri adv ;
nokk adv ;
sjálvsagt adv ;
ístaðin adv ;
haraftrat adv ;
aftarlaga adv ;
aftaná adv ;
aftur adv ;
afturi adv ;
aldri adv ;
aldrin adv ;
allastaðni adv ;
allíkavel adv ;
alsamt% enn adv ;
alskyns adv ;
altíð adv ;
annarleiðis adv ;
avbera adv ;
avstað adv ;
aðrastaðni adv ;
bara adv ;
beinavegin adv ;
beinleiðis adv ;
betur advcomp ; 
brennandi adv ;
brádliga adv ;
brátt adv ;
burtur adv ;
burturfrá adv ;
burturúr adv ;
burt adv ; !XXX
báðumegin adv ;
einaferð adv ;
eisini adv ;
endilega adv ;
enn adv ;
enntá adv ;
eystan adv ;
eystarlega adv ;
eystur adv ;
eystureftir adv ;
eysturi adv ;
fast adv ;
fram adv ;
framat adv ;
framleiðis adv ;
framman adv ;
frammanundan adv ;
framvegis adv ;
framvið adv ;
frammi adv ;
frálíka adv ;
fyribils adv ;
fyrr adv ; !XXX
fyrra adv ; !XXX
fyrrenn adv ;
fyrst adv ;
gjølla adv ;
hagar adv ;
har adv ;
harumframt adv ;
hasumegin adv ;
haðan adv ;
haðani adv ;
harafturat adv ;
heima adv ;
heimaftur adv ;
heldur adv ;
helst adv ;
her adv ;
herfyri adv ;
hesumegin adv ;
hiðani adv ;
higar adv ;
higartil adv ;
hinumegin adv ;
hinvegin adv ;
hvagar adv ;
hvar adv ;
hvaðan adv ;
hvussu adv ;
hvussuleiðis adv ;
hví adv ;
ið adv ;
ikki adv ;
illa adv ;
inn adv ;
innan adv ;
inni adv ;
innast adv ;
ivaleyst adv ;
javna adv ;
jú adv ;
júst adv ;
kanska adv ;
konufólkamegin adv ;
kortini adv ;
leingi adv ;
líkasum adv ; !XXX
longu adv ;
longur advcomp ;
longst advsuperl ;
mangan adv ;
meira adv ;
meir advcomp ; ! XXX now +Comp
miðskeiðis adv ;
mitt adv ; !XXX
morgin adv ; !XXX
møguliga adv ;
nakað adv ; !XXX
nakrantíð adv ;
neyvan adv ;
niðan adv ;
niðaneftir adv ;
niðri adv ;
niður adv ;
nær adv ;
næstan adv ;
norðureftir adv ;
nóg adv ;
nú adv ;
nú adv ;
ofta adv ;
oftast advsuperl ;
oman adv ;
omaneftir adv ;
ongantíð adv ;
onkustaðni adv ;
púra adv ;
raðid adv ;
ringan adv ;
rundanum adv ;
rættstundis adv ;
saman adv ;
samstundis adv ;
sanniliga adv ;
sera adv ;
serliga adv ;
sjaldan adv ;
sjáldan adv ; !SUB
sjálvandi adv ;
sjálvt adv ; !sjálvt um
snimma adv ;
soleiðis adv ;
somuleiðis adv ;
sostatt adv ;
stillisliga adv ;
straks adv ;
stundum adv ;
stutt adv ;
støðugt adv ;
suðureftir adv ;
sundur adv ; ! XXX morphology here?
síðan adv ;
síðani adv ;
tilsamans adv ; !XXX
tá adv ;
tíðliga adv ;
tó adv ;
umborð adv ;
umleið adv ;
umsíðir adv ;
upp adv ;
uppaftur adv ;
uppeftir adv ;
uppi adv ;
uttanlands adv ;
viðhvørt adv ; !XXX
valla adv ;
vestureftir adv ;
væl adv ;
árunt adv ;
áður adv ;
óføra adv ;
ógvuliga adv ;
óivað adv ;
ótrúliga adv ;
øgilega adv ;
øðrvísi adv ;
øðrumegin adv ;
uttanfyri adv ;
út adv ;
úteftir adv ;
úti adv ;
